Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-100.5 Purpose. The legislature
hereby declares that the purpose of this chapter is to recodify, without
substantive change, the insurance law in effect immediately prior to July 1,
1988. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1988" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next